pt-BR: Aplicação do elástico de malha: Artesanato/uso geral; Franzir/fazer babados; Faixa de cabelo; Abertura de perna; Confecção de máscaras; Decote; Punho da manga; Cós de roupa íntima; Cós; Outro
de: Verwendungszweck des Strickgummis: Basteln/Allzweck; Raffen/Kräuseln; Stirnband; Beinöffnung; Maskenherstellung; Ausschnitt; Ärmelbündchen; Unterwäsche-Bund; Bund; Sonstige
sl-SI: Namen uporabe pletene elastike: Ustvarjanje/splošna uporaba; Nabori/volančki; Trak za lase; Odprtina za nogo; Izdelava mask; Izrez; Manšeta rokava; Pas spodnjega perila; Pas; Drugo
cs: Pletená elastická aplikace: Řemesla / obecné použití; Řasení; Čelenka; Otvor na nohu; Výroba masek; Výstřih; Manžeta rukávu; Pas spodního prádla; Pas; Jiné
da: Brug af strikket elastik: Hobby/generelle formål; Rynkning; Pandebånd; Benåbning; Fremstilling af masker; Udskæring; Ærmemanchet; Linning til undertøj; Linning; Andet
ro-RO: Aplicație elastică tricotată: Artizanat/scop general; Încrețire/volane; Bentiță; Deschidere pentru picior; Confecționare de măști; Decolteu; Manșetă mânecă; Bandă pentru talie pentru lenjerie intimă; Bandă pentru talie; Altele
sk-SK: Aplikácia pružnej pleteniny: Remeselné/všeobecné účely; Riasenie/naberanie; Čelenka; Otvor na nohy; Výroba rúšok; Výstrih; Manžeta rukáva; Pás spodnej bielizne; Pás; Iné
el: Εφαρμογή ελαστικού πλεξίματος: Χειροτεχνία/γενική χρήση; Σούρες/βολάν; Κορδέλα μαλλιών; Άνοιγμα ποδιού; Κατασκευή μάσκας; Λαιμόκοψη; Μανσέτα; Λάστιχο εσωρούχων; Λάστιχο μέσης; Άλλο
en: Knit elastic application: Craft/general purpose; Gathering/ruffling; Headband; Leg opening; Mask making; Neckline; Sleeve cuff; Undergarment waistband; Waistband; Other
fi: Neulotun kuminauhan käyttötapa: Askartelu/yleiskäyttö; Poimutus/rypytys; Päänauha; Lahkeensuu; Maskien valmistus; Pääntie; Hihansuu; Alusvaatteiden vyötärönauha; Vyötärönauha; Muu
it: Applicazione elastico in maglia: Artigianato/uso generico; Arricciatura/increspatura; Fascia per capelli; Apertura della gamba; Creazione di maschere; Scollatura; Polsino della manica; Girovita per indumenti intimi; Girovita; Altro
vi: Ứng dụng dây thun dệt kim: Thủ công/mục đích chung; May nhún/tạo bèo; Băng đô; Ống quần; Làm khẩu trang; Cổ áo; Cổ tay áo; Lưng quần lót; Lưng quần; Khác
es: Aplicación de elástico de punto: Manualidades/uso general; Fruncido/plisado; Cinta para la cabeza; Abertura para la pierna; Elaboración de mascarillas; Escote; Puño de manga; Cinturilla de ropa interior; Cinturilla; Otra
ko: 니트 탄성 적용: 공예/다용도; 개더/러플; 헤드밴드; 레그 오프닝; 마스크 제작용; 네크라인; 소매 커프; 속옷 허리 밴드; 허리 밴드; 기타
ru: Назначение трикотажной эластичной ленты: Поделки/общее назначение; Сборка/рюши; Повязка на голову; Пройма для ног; Изготовление масок; Горловина; Манжета рукава; Резинка для нижнего белья; Поясная резинка; Другое
hr-HR: Pletena elastična aplikacija: Rukotvorine / opća namjena; Nabori / volani; Traka za glavu; Otvor za nogu; Izrada maski; Izrez oko vrata; Manšeta rukava; Pojas donjeg rublja; Pojas; Ostalo
nl: Gebreid elastiek toepassing: Knutselen/algemeen gebruik; Plooien/rimpelen; Hoofdband; Beenopening; Maskers maken; Halslijn; Mouwboord; Tailleband voor ondergoed; Tailleband; Anders
lt-LT: Megztos elastinės juostos paskirtis: Rankdarbiams / bendrosios paskirties; Raukimui / klosčių darymui; Galvajuostė; Kojos anga; Kaukių gamybai; Iškirptė; Rankogaliams; Apatinių drabužių juosmeniui; Juosmeniui; Kita
nb: Bruksområde for strikket elastikk: Håndverk / generelt bruk; Rynking/frynser; Pannebånd; Benåpning; Maskelaging; Halslinning; Ermelinning; Linning for undertøy; Linning; Annet
pl: Zastosowanie gumy dzianej: Rękodzieło/zastosowanie ogólne; Marszczenie/robienie falban; Opaska na głowę; Otwór na nogę; Robienie masek; Dekolt; Mankiet rękawa; Pasek do bielizny; Pasek; Inne
tr: Örme elastik uygulaması: El işi/genel amaçlı; Büzgü/fırfır; Kafa bandı; Bacak açıklığı; Maske yapımı; Yaka; Kol manşeti; İç çamaşırı bel bandı; Bel bandı; Diğer
bg-BG: Предназначение на плетения ластик: Занаяти/общо предназначение; Набиране/къдрене; Лента за глава; Отвор за крака; Изработка на маски; Деколте; Маншет на ръкав; Колан на бельо; Колан; Друго
zh-CN: 针织弹性应用: 手工艺/通用; 抽褶/打褶; 发带; 裤脚; 口罩制作; 领口; 袖口; 内衣腰带; 腰带; 其他
sv: Användningsområde för stickad resår: Pyssel/allmänt bruk; Rynkning/veckning; Pannband; Benöppning; Masktillverkning; Halslinning; Ärmslut; Midjeband för underkläder; Midjeband; Övrigt
ja: ニットゴム適用: クラフト/一般用途; ギャザー/フリル; ヘッドバンド; 裾; マスク作成; ネックライン; 袖口; 下着のウエストバンド; ウエストバンド; その他
zh-TW: 針織鬆緊帶適用用途: 手工藝/通用; 抓皺/荷葉邊; 髮帶; 褲管口; 口罩製作; 領口; 袖口; 內衣褲褲頭; 褲頭; 其他
fr: Usage de l’élastique tricoté: Artisanat/usage général; Fronces/volants; Bandeau; Ouverture de jambe; Fabrication de masques; Encolure; Poignet de manche; Ceinture de sous-vêtement; Ceinture; Autre
pt-PT: Aplicação de elástico de malha: Artesanato/uso geral; Franzido/plissado; Fita para a cabeça; Abertura da perna; Fazer máscaras; Decote; Punho da manga; Cós de roupa interior; Cós; Outro
hu: Kötött gumi felhasználási területe: Kézműves / általános célú; Ráncolás / fodrozás; Fejpánt; Lábszárnyílás; Maszkkészítés; Nyakvonal; Ujjvég (mandzsetta); Alsónemű derékpánt; Derékpánt; Egyéb
th: วิธีการเย็บยางยืดแบบถัก: งานฝีมือ/อเนกประสงค์; จับจีบ/ระบาย; ที่คาดผม; ปลายขา; ทำหน้ากาก; คอเสื้อ; ปลายแขนเสื้อ; ขอบเอวชุดชั้นใน; ขอบเอว; อื่นๆ